Massachusetts, session 194th, H1567.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17 the following section:-
Section 18. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall, unless the context
appears otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Affirmatively further”, to take any action rationally related to promoting any attribute or
attributes of fair housing.
“Fair housing”, housing that, among other attributes, is affordable, safe, decent, free of
unlawful discrimination and accessible as required by chapter 151B or 42 U.S.C.A. §§ 1982 and
3604.
of 2

“Large-scale development”, a condominium association or apartment building with 35 or
more residential dwelling units.
(b) Any person who intends to construct a large-scale development shall complete a fair
housing assessment in a form to be prescribed by the department of housing and community
development. The fair housing assessment shall describe, at a minimum: (1) the projected impact
of the development on fair housing, housing discrimination and displacement; and (2) how the
proposed development would minimize harm and affirmatively further fair housing.
(c) Any person who intends to construct a large-scale development shall provide the fair
housing assessment described in subsection (b) to the department of housing and community
development and the municipality in which the construction will take place not later than 180
days prior to the beginning of construction.
(d) The executive office of housing and liveable communities may issue fines for
noncompliance with this section.
SECTION 2. The executive office of housing and liveable communities shall promulgate
regulations in accordance with section 1, including a schedule of fines for noncompliance, not
later than 60 days after the effective date of this act.
of 2